Mississippi, session 2026, SB2392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) For purposes of this section: (a)  "Automatic renewal" means a plan or arrangement in which a paid subscription service or purchasing agreement is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term; (b)  "Business" means any commercial entity making an automatic renewal offer for a subscription period greater than one (1) month to a consumer in this state. (2)  It shall be unlawful for any business to fail to provide an acknowledgement that includes the automatic renewal offer terms, cancellation policy and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer. If the offer includes a free gift or trial, the acknowledgment shall also disclose in the acknowledgement how to cancel and allow the consumer to cancel before the consumer pays for the goods or services. (3)  No less than seven (7) days, but no more than twenty-one (21) days, before the automatic renewal date, the business shall provide notice to the consumer, through the means agreed to by the consumer in the acknowledgment, of the date the plan will renew, together with information regarding how to cancel. (4)  It shall be unlawful for any business to charge the consumer's credit card, debit card or account with a third party for an automatic renewal without first having complied with subsection (2) or (3) of this section, as the case may be.  If a business violates this subsection, then the business shall refund the consumer the full amount charged pursuant to the automatic renewal. (5)  Upon cancellation by a consumer within ten (10) days following the automatic renewal of any subscription for a period greater than one (1) month, the subscription amount must be refunded pro rata or in full to the consumer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.